Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3302
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage the use of all proven techniques for the enforcement of support orders. The Legislature finds that the potential suspension of a professional, occupational, or recreational license or a motor vehicle operator's license for failure to pay child, spousal, and medical support is an effective technique for the enforcement of support orders, particularly for non-wage-earning and self-employed license holders who are not in compliance with support orders. It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage license holders to comply with their legal obligations and to add to the tools available for the enforcement of support orders. Therefor, the Department of Health and Human Services, county attorneys, authorized attorneys, or courts of competent jurisdiction are authorized to initiate actions under the License Suspension Act against individuals who are not in compliance with support orders.

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 2.